California, session 20252026, AB298.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1367.55 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1367.55. (a) A large group health care service plan contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, 2027, shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other cost-sharing requirement for in-network health care services provided to an enrollee under 21 years of age, except as provided in subdivision (c). (b) An individual or entity shall not bill or seek reimbursement from an enrollee or contractholder of a large group health care service plan contract for in-network health care services provided to an enrollee under 21 years of age, except as provided in subdivision (c).(c) In the case of a large group health care service plan contract that is a high deductible health plan qualifying as eligible for use in combination with a health savings account under the definition set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the health care service plan contract shall not impose either of the following: (1) A deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other cost-sharing requirement for preventive care services, as defined for purposes of Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, provided to an enrollee under 21 years of age.(2) Coinsurance, a copayment, or other cost-sharing requirement for in-network health care services provided to an enrollee under 21 years of age once a health care service plan contract’s deductible has been satisfied for the plan year. (d) For purposes of this section, “in-network health care services” means all of the following: (1) Covered services provided by a contracting provider.(2) Covered services from a contracting health facility at which, or as a result of which, the enrollee receives services provided by a noncontracting provider.(3) Covered emergency services.(4) Covered services provided to an enrollee by a noncontracting provider when a contracting provider is not available to provide the service in accordance with the timely access requirements described in Section 1367.03. (e) This section does not expand or otherwise affect the scope of required coverage for out-of-network emergency services, except to the extent that cost-sharing requirements for covered out-of-network emergency services shall not be imposed on an enrollee under 21 years of age pursuant to subdivision (a). SEC. 2. Section 10123.187 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.187. (a) A large group health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, 2027, shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other cost-sharing requirement for in-network health care services provided to an insured under 21 years of age, except as provided in subdivision (c).(b) An individual or entity shall not bill or seek reimbursement from an insured or policyholder of a large group health insurance policy for in-network health care services provided to an insured under 21 years of age, except as provided in subdivision (c).(c) In the case of a large group health insurance policy that is a high deductible health plan qualifying as eligible for use in combination with a health savings account under the definition set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the health insurance policy shall not impose either of the following:(1) A deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other cost-sharing requirement for preventive care services, as defined for purposes of Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, provided to an insured under 21 years of age.(2) Coinsurance, a copayment, or other cost-sharing requirement for in-network health care services provided to an insured under 21 years of age once a health insurance policy’s deductible has been satisfied for the plan year.(d) For purposes of this section, “in-network health care services” means all of the following:(1) Covered services provided by a contracting provider.(2) Covered services from a contracting health facility at which, or as a result of which, the insured receives services provided by a noncontracting provider.(3) Covered emergency services.(4) Covered services provided to an insured by a noncontracting provider when a contracting provider is not available to provide the service in accordance with the timely access requirements described in Section 10133.54.(e) This section does not expand or otherwise affect the scope of required coverage for out-of-network emergency services, except to the extent that cost-sharing requirements for covered out-of-network emergency services shall not be imposed on an insured under 21 years of age pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.